Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ZEITGEIST ARTS.new text end new text begin $1,100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Zeitgeist Arts to facilitate community arts access by restoring and renovating the historic Zeitgeist Arts building in downtown Duluth. new text end